District of Columbia statutes.
16-582

Attachments to which this subchapter is applicable.

This subchapter applies only with respect to attachments upon wages, as defined by section 16-571 , issued on or after 60 days from August 4, 1959. Unless otherwise specified, this subchapter does not apply to notices or orders to withhold issued pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 46.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 2(e), 53 DCR 1886
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 111(a)(3), 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 16-582.
1973 Ed., § 16-582.
D.C. Law 16-100 added “Unless otherwise specified, this subchapter does not apply to notices or orders to withhold issued pursuant to Subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 46.” to the end.
D.C. Law 17-353 substituted “subchapter I of Chapter 2” for “Subchapter I of Chapter 2”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-42, December 10, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 11038).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).